Louisiana, session 2026, HB877.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1116 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1116. Shared pipelines
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the owners or
operators of separate storage facilities shall not utilize the same pipelines for
transport of carbon dioxide for storage.